Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-464
Partnerships; applicability of act.

On and after January 1, 2001, the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 governs all partnerships.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 64;

Laws 2008, LB707, § 2.